Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.04.020

Reserved name.

A person may reserve the exclusive use of a corporate name in accordance with RCW 23.95.310.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2115; 1989 c 165 s 38.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.